Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.170

City may extend water system outside limits.

When a city or town owns or operates a municipal waterworks system and desires to extend such utility beyond its corporate limits it may acquire, construct and maintain any addition to or extension of the system, and dispose of and distribute water to any other municipality, water-sewer district, community, or person desiring to purchase it.

[ 1999 c 153 s 40; 1965 c 7 s 35.92.170. Prior: 1933 ex.s. c 17 s 1; RRS s 9502-1. Cf. 1917 c 12 s 1. Formerly RCW 80.40.170.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.

Water-sewer districts: Title 57 RCW.